Utah statutes.
7-3-2.   Restrictions on conduct of banking business.
(1)  The establishment or operation in this state of private or partnership
banks is expressly prohibited.
(2)  An institution may establish or maintain a main office or branch in this
state at which to conduct banking business only if:
(a)  it is legitimately chartered as a bank by a state, the federal
government, or a foreign government; and
(b)  in the case of a bank whose home state is not Utah, it is authorized to
have a branch in Utah under the laws of this state and the laws of its home
state.
